Utah statutes.
34-20a-3.   Fire fighters' right to bargain collectively.
Fire fighters have the right to bargain collectively about wages, hours, and
other conditions of employment with corporate authorities and to be
represented in such negotiations by a bargaining representative chosen by such
fire fighters.
